Nevada, session 83, AB331.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services for a grant program to
expand the biennial survey administered pursuant to the Youth Risk
Behavior Surveillance System developed by the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $220,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $220,000
2. The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services shall develop and
implement a grant program to award grants from the money
appropriated by subsection 1 to institutions within the Nevada
System of Higher Education to expand the biennial survey
administered pursuant to the Youth Risk Behavior Surveillance
System developed by the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services as required by NRS 392.422.
3. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)